Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.110

Protection of party or child.

(1) For the purposes of this section, "protection order" means an injunction or other order, issued under the domestic violence, family violence, or stalking laws of the issuing jurisdiction, to prevent an individual from engaging in a violent or threatening act against, harassment of, contact or communication with, or being in physical proximity to another individual who is a party or a child under the custodial responsibility of a party.

(2) If a party is subject to a protection order or has been convicted of a domestic violence offense, including child abuse, or if an arbitrator determines there is a reasonable basis to believe a party's safety or ability to participate effectively in arbitration is at risk, the arbitrator shall stay the arbitration and refer the parties to court. The arbitration may not proceed unless the party at risk affirms the arbitration agreement in a record and the court determines:

(a) The affirmation is informed and voluntary;

(b) Arbitration is not inconsistent with the protection order; and

(c) Reasonable procedures are in place to protect the party from risk of harm, harassment, or intimidation.

(3) This section supplements remedies available under law of this state other than this chapter for the protection of victims of domestic violence, family violence, stalking, harassment, or similar abuse.

[ 2023 c 61 s 12.]